Hawaii statutes.
[§398A-2] Inapplicability. This
chapter shall not apply to any leave of absence provided to any public employee
serving as an organ or bone marrow donor pursuant to section 78-23.6. [L 2014,
c 161, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next